Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1994.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2720. Political intimidation.(a) Offense defined.--(1) A person commits the offense of political intimidation if, with malicious intention toward another individual, group of individuals or their property, as a result of political affiliation, the person commits an offense under:(i) any other provision of this article;(ii) Chapter 33 (relating to arson, criminal mischief and other property destruction), except as provided under paragraph (2); or123456789101112131415161718 (iii) section 3503 (relating to criminal trespass).(2) Section 3307 (relating to institutional vandalism) shall not apply to paragraph (1)(ii).(b) Grading.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), an offense under this section shall be classified as a misdemeanor of the third degree if the other offense is classified as a summary offense.(2) An offense under this section shall be classified one degree higher than the classification of the other offense specified in section 106 (relating to classes of offenses).(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Malicious intention." The intention to commit an act, the commission of which is a necessary element of an offense under subsection (a) motivated by hatred toward the political affiliation of another individual or group of individuals."Political affiliation." Belonging to or endorsing, verbally or nonverbally, a political party or ideology.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1994PN2523 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122